Texas statutes.
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CODE

TITLE 3. LICENSES AND PERMITS

SUBTITLE A. PERMITS

CHAPTER 43. LOCAL CARTAGE PERMIT

Text of section as amended by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 434 (S.B. 1232), Sec. 2

For text of section as amended by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 147, see other Sec. 43.01.

Sec. 43.01. AUTHORIZED ACTIVITIES. (a) A warehouse or transfer company that holds a local cartage permit may transport liquor for hire inside the corporate limits of any city or town in the state.

(b) A package store, wine only package store, or local distributor's permittee who also holds a local cartage permit may transfer alcoholic beverages in accordance with Sections 22.08, 23.04, and 24.04 of this code.

(c) A package store, wine only package store, or wine and beer retailer's permittee who also holds a local cartage permit may make deliveries to and collections from customers in accordance with Section 22.03, 24.03, or 25.15, as appropriate.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 457, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 434 (S.B. 1232), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Text of section as amended by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 147

For text of section as amended by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 434 (S.B. 1232), Sec. 2, see other Sec. 43.01.

Sec. 43.01. AUTHORIZED ACTIVITIES. A warehouse or transfer company that holds a local cartage permit may transport liquor for hire inside the corporate limits of any city or town in the state.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 457, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 147, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 43.03. PERMIT REQUIRED. No person may transport liquor for hire inside a city or town unless he holds a local cartage permit. No person may transport liquor in violation of the motor carrier laws of this state.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 457, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Text of section as amended by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 434 (S.B. 1232), Sec. 3

For text of section as amended by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 148, see other Sec. 43.04.

Sec. 43.04. ELIGIBILITY FOR PERMIT. The commission may issue a local cartage permit to a warehouse or transfer company or to a holder of a package store, wine only package store, wine and beer retailer's, or local distributor's permit.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 457, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 434 (S.B. 1232), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

Text of section as amended by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 148

For text of section as amended by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 434 (S.B. 1232), Sec. 3, see other Sec. 43.04.

Sec. 43.04. ELIGIBILITY FOR PERMIT. The commission may issue a local cartage permit to a warehouse or transfer company.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 457, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 148, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 43.05. VEHICLES USED BY PERMITTEE. (a) No local cartage permittee may transport liquor unless:

(1) a description of each vehicle used in the transportation, as required by the commission, has been submitted to the commission; and

(2) each vehicle has been plainly marked or lettered to indicate that it is being used for the transportation of liquor by a local cartage permittee.

(b) The transportation of liquor by a permittee in a vehicle not described and marked in accordance with this section is a violation of this code and is a ground for the cancellation of the permit.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 457, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 43.06. CERTAIN TRANSPORTATION PROHIBITED. No holder of a local cartage permit may for hire transport liquor between incorporated cities or towns in this state.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 457, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.